Louisiana, session 2026, HB864.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:4741.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§4741.1. Fire limits authorized; storage of flammable, explosive, and combustible
materials under structures
A. For the purposes of this Section, the following words shall have the
following meanings:
(1) "Combustible" means a material capable of producing a usually rapid
chemical process that creates heat and usually light.
(2) "Explosive" means any chemical compound mixture, or device, the
primary or common purpose of which is to function by explosion.
(3) "Flammable" means a material capable of being easily ignited and
burning quickly, including but not limited to candles, bonfires or open flames, or any
other flame-producing devices.
B. Any municipality in the state may provide for the prevention of fires by
establishing fire limits and prohibiting the storage, placement, accumulation,
abandonment, or use of flammable, explosive, or combustible material above ground
within the right-of-way of a public bridge, overpass, viaduct, or tunnel.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 864 ENROLLED
C. Any parish or municipality in the state may authorize the use of
flammable, explosive, or combustible materials for events permitted by the parish
or municipality, provided that such permits or agreements are subject to all state and
federal laws and regulations.
D. Any person who willfully and knowingly violates this Section or any rule,
regulation, or order issued under this Section may be subject to a fine of not more
than one thousand dollars for each violation.
E. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to apply to infrastructure owned
or operated by member-owned electric cooperatives or investor-owned utilities that
are regulated by the Public Service Commission or the governing authority of the
city of New Orleans.
F. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit temporary, attended activity
involving approved equipment or materials when such activity is authorized under
otherwise applicable law and complies with all applicable state, federal, parish,
municipal, fire, health, traffic, public-safety, and right-of-way requirements.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.